Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; STATEWIDE FAMILY MEDIATION PILOT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for a grant to Community Mediation Minnesota to administer a statewide family mediation pilot program to provide support to grandparents and families. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) The grant money must be used to: new text end new text begin (1) provide family dispute resolution services; new text end new text begin (2) increase awareness of and access to family dispute resolution services statewide; new text end new text begin (3) provide alternative dispute resolution services, including but not limited to family reconnection coaching, mediation, and navigation services; new text end new text begin (4) partner with culturally specific dispute resolution programs to provide training and assistance with virtual and in-person mediation services; new text end new text begin (5) increase the number of mediators on the family mediator roster; new text end new text begin (6) increase competency of mediators on the family mediator roster; new text end new text begin (7) integrate mediation services with navigation and resource connection services, legal assistance, and court services programs; new text end new text begin (8) develop and administer evaluation tools to design, modify, and replicate effective program outcomes; and new text end new text begin (9) provide for necessary administrative expenses. new text end